Hawaii statutes.
§128D-32 Definitions. As used in this
part, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Prospective purchaser" means
a prospective owner, operator, tenant, developer, lender, or any other party
who would not otherwise be liable under section 128D-6, prior to a voluntary
response action being conducted.

"Requesting party" means the person
or persons submitting an application to conduct a voluntary response action.

"Voluntary response action" means a
response conducted voluntarily by a requesting party. [L 1997, c 377, pt of §2;
am L 2005, c 133, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next